Montana, session 2025, HB847.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Appropriation. (1) There is appropriated $210,000 from the general
license account established in 87-1-601 to the department of fish, wildlife, and parks for each fiscal year in the
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 847

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 847.1
biennium beginning July 1, 2025, to fund budgeted positions for two full-time bear technicians in region 3.
(2) The appropriations in subsection (1) are intended to supplement base funding to the
department of fish, wildlife, and parks to fund these positions.
(3) The legislature intends that the appropriation in fiscal year 2027 be considered as part of the
ongoing base for subsequent legislative sessions.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 847